District of Columbia statutes.
6-204

Tax exemption.

(a)

All assets and income of the Authority and all Housing Properties (whether or not owned or operated by the Authority) shall be exempt from District taxation, subject to the conditions contained in subsection (b) of this section and the approval required by subsection (c) of this section. Absent an agreement with the Authority approved by the Council, for-profit activities shall not be exempt from District taxation.

(b)

The Authority is empowered to negotiate tax exemption agreements concerning for-profit activities. These tax exemption agreements shall be limited to full or partial relief from the following District taxes: property, income, and sales. The maximum duration of any tax exemption agreement under this section shall be 5 years.

(c)

Before a tax exemption agreement involving for-profit activities can become effective, legislation for this purpose shall be submitted to the Council for approval by act.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 5, 47 DCR 1325
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-337, § 2(b), 52 DCR 2278

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-337, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “for-profit activities” for “for-profit activities involving Housing Properties”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Housing Authority Revitalization Projects Temporary Amendment Act of 2004(D.C. Law 15-260, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4372).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 6-201.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Housing Authority Revitalization Projects Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-552, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10356).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of District of Columbia Housing Authority Revitalization Projects Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-36, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 3026).